Massachusetts, session 194th, H3540.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 29 of chapter 21A of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 239
of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by adding the following two paragraphs:

The undersecretary of environmental justice and equity shall have oversight of ensuring
an equitable allocation of the benefits of clean energy spending across the Commonwealth, and
that such allocation is proportional to the percentage of the population residing in (1)
environmental justice populations as defined in section 62 of chapter 30 or (2) any low-income
communities designated by the undersecretary for inclusion based on previously developed
criteria. The undersecretary, in consultation with a defined working group of environmental
justice stakeholders, shall set compliance goals and issue compliance reports on the same
schedule for emission limits required under section 4(g) of chapter 21N for delivery of clean
energy benefits to environmental justice communities.
of 3


The undersecretary shall consult with the environmental justice council as established
under section 62L of chapter 30 and any other stakeholders the undersecretary finds appropriate,
including additional representatives from environmental justice communities, local governments,
clean energy advocates, and public health experts, to develop, review, and update a definition of
clean energy benefits. This definition shall account for the net impact of burdens and shall also
include consideration of spending and benefits from state clean energy programs, pollution
reduction, transportation, economic development, and energy cost reduction. The undersecretary
shall be responsible for developing a framework for tracking and monitoring allocation of clean
energy benefits across the commonwealth. The undersecretary shall work with the secretary to
ensure alignment with these definitions and the framework for social benefits and burdens in
section 30. The undersecretary shall coordinate with any agencies overseeing clean energy
programs to incorporate these definitions and the framework into the program reviews which
they are directed to undertake to monitor and evaluate clean energy programs. All clean energy
program reviews beginning on January 1 of the year following the undersecretary’s creation of
the definition and framework shall detail the amount and allocation of said benefits, and identify
any barriers to participation as well as any measures to reduce said barriers, including but not
limited to community organization partnerships, streamlined application processes, multilingual
options, and no-cost or low cost financing.The level of benefits shall be reviewed and updated
every 5 years beginning in 2025. The undersecretary may adopt regulations as deemed necessary
for implementation of this section and shall consult with the energy efficiency advisory council
as established under section 22 of chapter 25 and the grid modernization advisory council as
established under section 92C of chapter 164 to ensure alignment of the definition of benefits
of 3

and to develop comprehensive guidelines across all programs to address specific challenges for
rental properties including but not limited to protections against rent increases or other
detrimental impacts after clean energy resources are installed in the property.

SECTION 2. The first stakeholder group meeting required under section 1 shall occur not
later than January 1, 2026.
of 3